Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1443
Law enforcement reserve officers; rights and duties when activated; weapon, when carried; subordinate to regular force officers.

(1) Law enforcement reserve officers, upon being activated by the sheriff, the mayor, or the chief of police, and while on assigned duty, shall be vested with the same rights, privileges, obligations, and duties of any other peace officer of this state.

(2) No person appointed to the reserve force may carry a weapon or otherwise act as a peace officer until he has been approved by the governing body. After approval, he may carry a weapon only when authorized by the sheriff or chief of police and when discharging official duties as a duly constituted peace officer.

(3) Law enforcement reserve officers shall be subordinate to regular force officers, shall not serve as a peace officer unless under the direction of regular officers, and when serving with regular force officers shall wear no insignia of rank. Each department for which a reserve force is established shall appoint a regular force officer as the reserve force coordinating and supervising officer. Such regular officer shall report directly to the sheriff or the chief of police.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 6.